Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1526
Reimbursement; not subject to legal process or attachment; when.

The amount of reimbursement to be paid for remedial action which was done by a third party shall not be subject to legal process or attachment if paid to the responsible person for the purpose of payment to a third party who performed the remedial action.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 26.